Hawaii statutes.
§571-52.3 Immediate income withholding.
In any case where child support is an issue, and an order for child support is
established or modified, and the obligor receives income on a periodic basis,
the court shall concurrently enter an order for immediate income withholding
which shall operate as an assignment by the person to the child support
enforcement agency for the benefit of the child of such amounts at such times
as may be specified in the support order. Such order may also include child
support arrears and reimbursement of debt pursuant to section 346-37.1. The
provisions of section 571-52.2(d), (e), (f), (g), (l), (m), and (n) shall apply
to all orders for immediate income withholding issued under this section. [L
1988, c 200, §2; am L 1990, c 152, §2]

Case Notes

Impracticality did not excuse father from income withholding
under this section. 82 H. 543 (App.), 923 P.2d 960.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next